Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-259
County fairgrounds; equipment purchase; additional tax levy.

Pursuant to a request by a county agricultural society, the county board
of any county may levy an additional levy of three and five-tenths cents on
each one hundred dollars of taxable valuation, or any part thereof, for the
purpose of acquiring an interest in real property to comprise a portion or
all of the county fairgrounds, for the purpose of capital
construction on and renovation, repair, improvement, and maintenance of the
county fairgrounds, over and above the operational tax levy authorized in
section 2-257, or for the purpose
of purchasing equipment. Such levy shall not exceed the amount
actually required for such acquisition or work and shall be subject to section
77-3443.

Laws 1969, c. 11, § 7, p. 149;

Laws 1977, LB 484, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 7;

Laws 1988, LB 977, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 398, § 4;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 2-203.06;

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 10;

Laws 1999, LB 437, § 24;

Laws 2000, LB 1190, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB597, § 1.